Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1445
Reserve officers; supplementary capacity; not to reduce or assume duties of peace officers.

(1) The governing body shall not reduce the authorized size of a law enforcement department because of the establishment or utilization of reserve officers.

(2) Reserve officers shall act only in a supplementary capacity to the regular force and shall in no case assume the full-time duties of peace officers without first complying with all requirements for such regular peace officers.

Laws 1976, LB 782, § 8.